Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.124, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Review. (a) The department must provide districts an opportunity to request that the department add to the list of curricula or professional development programs a specific curriculum or professional development program. The department must publish the request for reconsideration procedure on the department website. A request for review must demonstrate that the curriculum or intervention program meets the requirements of the Read Act, is evidence-based, and has structured literacy components. The review process must use the rubric used to approve curriculum under subdivision 1 with the addition of culturally responsive criteria as determined by the department. Alternative curriculum and intervention programs for those who cannot access sound-based approaches must be reviewed on the same review cycle as traditional programs. (b) The department and CAREI must conduct a final curriculum review of previously submitted curriculum by March 3, 2025, to review curriculum that is available to districts at no cost. new text begin (c) After March 3, 2025, the department must provide districts or curriculum publishers an opportunity to request that the department add to the list of curricula a specific curriculum. The request for review must demonstrate that the curriculum meets the requirements of the Read Act, is evidence-based, and has structured literacy components. The district or curriculum publisher must pay the department for the curriculum review. The fee assessed by the department for the review must not exceed actual review costs or $3,500, whichever is less. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from March 3, 2025. new text end